Tennessee, session 114, HB2346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Fair Background Check and
Due Process Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 6, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Consumer reporting agency" means any organization or entity that
provides or conducts criminal history background checks or criminal history
HB2346
011527
- 1 -

background reports for purposes of employment, housing, or licensing, but does
not include a law enforcement agency;
(2) "Excluded offense" means an offense involving:
(A) Theft;
(B) Fraud;
(C) Financial crimes;
(D) Embezzlement;
(E) Forgery;
(F) Murder or attempted murder;
(G) Aggravated homicide-related offenses; or
(H) Violent conduct directly related to job safety; and
(3) "Non-conviction record" means any arrest, charge, indictment, or
criminal case that has not resulted in a conviction, and includes cases or charges
that are pending, dismissed, diverted, or for which a nolle prosequi was entered.
(b) A consumer reporting agency shall not report a non-conviction record to an
employer, landlord, or licensing agency unless the charge is an excluded offense. A
consumer reporting agency may only report charges resulting in a guilty verdict or a plea
of guilty.
(c) This section does not prohibit an employer from:
(1) Conducting interviews of job candidates;
(2) Asking prospective employees about relevant job-related conduct; or
(3) Requiring licensing background checks as required by federal law.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011527